Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-224
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-201 to 71-261 shall be known and may be cited as the Barber Act.

Laws 1927, c. 163, § 23, p. 436;

C.S.1929, § 71-2027;

R.S.1943, § 71-224;

Laws 1971, LB 1020, § 31;

Laws 1993, LB 226, § 11;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 62;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 91;

Laws 2020, LB755, § 25.